hfst/filter.styles.twolc
Alphabet

  a b c d e f g h i ï j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å
  A B C D E F G H I Ï J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
  á é í 
  Å Ä Ö Ø Æ Á
  Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð Ŋ Ŧ Č Ž     
  á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð đ ß ª ß ç ŋ ŧ č ž 

  %+N %+Sg %+Pl %+Nom %+Acc %+Gen %+Ine %+Ela %+Ill %+Com %+Ess
  %+PxSg1 %+PxSg2 %+PxSg3
  %+PxDu1 %+PxDu2 %+PxDu3
  %+PxPl1 %+PxPl2 %+PxPl3
  
  %+V %+Prs %+Prt
  %+Sg1 %+Sg2 %+Sg3
  %+Du1 %+Du2 %+Du3
  %+Pl1 %+Pl2 %+Pl3
  
  %+Neg    ! negation verb ij
  %+ConNeg ! main verb complement to Neg, form identical to Imp
  %+VAbess ! Verb Abessive

  %+Inf  %+PrfPrc %+PrsPrc
  %+Ger ! Gerund

  %+Ind
  %+Imprt %+ImprtII ! ImprtII only for Neg
  %+Pot %+Cond  ! %+Opt (Hasselbrink 48.3.I, 48.14, 48.15, 48.21)
  %+Act ! -eme, could be chagned to %+Actio

  %+A
  %+Pred ! Predicative form, corresponds to %+A%+Nom%+Sg in sme
  %+Comp %+Superl
  %+Attr
  
  %+CS %+CC %+Pcle 
  %+ABBR %+ACR ! Abbreviation, acronym
  %+TV %+IV ! Transitivity tags
  %+LOAN  ! ad hoc tag for development purposes.
  %+Uml   ! A tag to indicate realised or potential Umlaut
  %+Hyph  ! A tag to indicate that a hyphen was used when compounding

  %+Pron %+Pers %+Refl %+Recipr %+Dem %+Indef %+Interr %+Rel
  %+Po %+Pr %+Adv %+Interj %+Num %+Ord
  %+Coll ! Collective numeral

  %+Prop %+Mal %+Fem %+Sur ! Semantic properties of names
  
  %+CLB %+PUNCT %+LEFT %+RIGHT
  
  %+Cmpnd
  %+SgNomCmp %+PlGenCmp %+SgGenCmp
  %+CmpOnly
  %+SgCmp %+SgNomCmp %+SgGenCmp %+PlGenCmp %+Cmpnd %+Cmpnd%+ %+Guess %+ShCmp !testing ShCmp
  %+First %+Last %+None %+CmpOnly %+SgNomLeft %+SgGenLeft %+PlGenLeft %+SgLeft %+AllCmp
  
! Normative/prescriptive compounding tags:
! (to govern compound behaviour for the speller, ie what a compound SHOULD BE)
 %+First %+Last ! Spellertag: Can be first/last member of compound
 %+None ! Spellertag: Can not participate in compounds
 %+CmpOnly ! spellertag: can *only* participate in compounds
 %+SgNomLeft %+SgGenLeft %+PlGenLeft %+SgLeft ! Restriction on compound to the left
 %+AllCmp ! Allow all compounding patterns
 %+DefSgGenCmp %+DefPlGenCmp %+DefCmp ! Default values
! to be renamed:  %+§SgNomCmp %+§SgGenCmp %+§PlGenCmp

 %+CmpN/Sg %+CmpN/SgN %+CmpN/SgG %+CmpN/PlG
 %+CmpN/First %+CmpN/Last %+CmpN/None %+CmpN/Only
 %+CmpN/SgLeft %+CmpN/SgNomLeft %+CmpN/SgGenLeft %+CmpN/PlGenLeft
 %+CmpN/All %+CmpN/Def %+CmpN/DefSgGen %+CmpN/DefPlGen

  
  
  %+Use/Sub   ! Substandard
  %+Use/Marg  ! Marginal
  %+Use/Circ  ! Circular path
  %+Use/CircN ! ???
  %+Use/Ped   ! Remove from pedagogical speller
  %+Use/NG    ! Do not generate, for isme-ped.fst and apertium
  %+Dial/%-S   ! Not in the South
  %+Dial/%-N   ! Not in the North
  
  ! Different focus particles
  %+Foc/ge
  %+Foc/gan
  %+Foc/gih
  %+Foc/gænnah


  X2 X3 X4
  E2 ! insert e ! Fjern denne.

  !Umlaut and diphthong simplification triggers:
  %^DISIMP
  %^COMPDISIMP
  %^COMPDISIMP2
  %^NOMAGieDISIMP
  %^1UML  ! a-uml, like 1sg prs, perf.part of båetedh/V-I, and ill sg of -ie nouns
  %^2UML  ! dark e, as 3sg prs & perf.part of tjearodh/V-II, and ill sg of -oe nouns
  %^3UML  ! not used
  %^3sUML ! a-uml in 3sg prs of V-IV (roehtedh - ruahta)
  %^3dUML ! ie-uml in 1du & 3pl prs of V-IV (roehtedh - ruehtien)
  %^iæUML ! not used
  %^iUML  ! i-uml in pret of V-I (båetedh - böötim)
  %^PASSUML ! Short passive Umlaut Rx->R5
  %^didhUML !Der/didh Umlaut for GUARKEDH-words
  %^htjidhUML !Umlaut für der/htjidh derivations
  %^adteUML !Umlaut für Der/adte and Der/alle derivations
  %^aLATUS  ! Latus-Umlaut for -ie stems
  %^uLATUS  ! Latus-Umlaut for -oe stems

! Flag diacritics
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@  @D.NeedNoun.ON@  @C.NeedNoun@ ! (Dis)allowing compounds
 @U.Cap.Obl@  @U.Cap.Opt@			! Allowing downcasing of
						            ! derived names: deatnulasj.
        							! Actually, downcasing should be obligatory

! Der#begin
! Derivation position in a derivation row:  Affix and:
! 1              2               3                4                         POS type
%+Der1           %+Der2           %+Der3            %+Der4
! Der#1
! Der#2
! Der#3
! Der#4
! Der#other
								%+Der/PassL                                  ! VV - long only
								%+Der/PassS                                  ! VV - short only
%+Der/htalle                                                                 ! VV - Passive
%+Der/lgidh                                                                  ! VV - Passive
%+Der/NomAg                                                                  ! VN
%+Der/ijes                                                                   ! NA
%+Der/NomAct                                                                 ! VN
%+Der/æjja                                                                   ! VA
%+Der/ihks                                                                   ! VA
%+Der/les                                                                    ! VA
%+Der/ldihkie                                                                ! VA
%+Der/ldahke                                                                 ! VA
%+Der/ldh                                                                    ! VA
                %+Der/voete                                                  ! AN
%+Der/htidh                                                                  ! VV - Causative
!%+Der/dehte                                                                  ! VV - Causative
%+Der/lidh                                                                   ! VV - Subitive
%+Der/stidh                                                                  ! VV - Diminutive
%+Der/didh                                                                   ! VV - Continuative
%+Der/htjidh                                                                 ! Dim-cont.
%+Der/htovve                                                                 ! AV 
%+Der/htoeve                                                                 ! AV 
%+Der/htehte                                                                 ! AV
                                %+Der/ahtje                                  !VV - Inchoative
                                %+Der/gåete                                 ! VV - Inchoative
%+Der/Dim                                                                    ! NN - Diminutive
%+Der/Rec                                                                    ! NN - Forholdsformer
                %+Der/ehte                                                     !VV - Causative
                %+Der/adte                                                 !VV - Frequentative
                %+Der/alle                                                   !VV - Frequentative
                %+Der/eds
! Der#end

;



Rules

"No substandard forms"
%+Use/Sub /<= _ ;

"No rare forms"
%+Use/Marg /<= _ ;
